test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-laint_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - laint: # Noun 97 'eng /est laine/fin' - full paradigm
     laint+N+Sg+Nom: laint
     laint+N+Sg+Gen: laint
     laint+N+Sg+Par: laintõ
     laint+N+Sg+Dat: laintõn
     laint+N+Sg+Ins: laintkõks
     laint+N+Sg+Ill: laintõ
     laint+N+Sg+Ela: laintstõ
     laint+N+Pl+Nom: lāinõd
     laint+N+Pl+Gen: lāinõd
     laint+N+Pl+Par: lāinidi
     laint+N+Pl+Dat: lāinõdõn
     laint+N+Pl+Ins: lāinõdõks
     laint+N+Pl+Ill: lāiniž
     laint+N+Pl+Ela: lāinist
